en: Spoons
xx: Spoons
cs: Lžíce
da: Skeer
de: Löffel
es: Cucharas
fr: Cuillères, Cuillère
it: Cucchiai
ja: スプーン
nl: Lepels
no: Skjeer
pl: Łyżki
pt: Colheres
ru: Ложки
sv: Skedar
tr: Kaşıklar

en: Table Knives
xx: Table Knives
cs: Stolní nože
da: Bordknive
de: Tafelmesser
es: Cuchillos de mesa
fr: Couteaux de table
it: Coltelli da tavolo
ja: テーブルナイフ
nl: Tafelmessen
no: Bordkniver
pl: Noże stołowe
pt: Facas de mesa
ru: Столовые ножи
sv: Bordsknivar
tr: Masa Bıçakları

en: Salt & Pepper Shakers
xx: Salt & Pepper Shakers
cs: Slánky a pepřenky
da: Salt- og peberkværne
de: Salz- & Pfefferstreuer
es: Saleros y pimenteros
fr: Salières et moulins à poivre
it: Shaker e macine
ja: 塩・こしょう入れ
nl: Peper-en-zoutstellen
no: Salt- og pepperbøsser
pl: Solniczki i pieprzniczki
pt: Conjunto saleiro e pimenteiro
ru: Солонки и перечницы
sv: Salt- och pepparströare
tr: Tuz ve Biber Karıştırıcılar

en: Serveware
xx: Serveware
cs: Jídelní servisy
da: Serveringsfade og -skåle
de: Servierware
es: Utensilios de servir
fr: Vaisselle de service
it: Piatti da portata
ja: 大皿・取り分け用食器
nl: Serviesgoed
no: Serveringsartikler
pl: Naczynia do serwowania żywności
pt: Utensílios para servir
ru: Предметы сервировки
sv: Serveringsfat och skålar
tr: Servis Takımları

en: Butter Dishes
xx: Butter Dishes
cs: Misky na máslo
da: Smørskåle
de: Butterdosen
es: Platos para mantequilla
fr: Beurriers
it: Piatti burro
ja: バターケース
nl: Botervlootjes
no: Smørskåler
pl: Maselniczki
pt: Mantegueiras
ru: Маслёнки
sv: Smörfat
tr: Tereyağı Tabakları

en: Cake Boards
xx: Cake Boards
cs: Podnosy na dort
da: Kageplader
de: Kuchenplatten
es: Bandejas para tartas
fr: Plats à gâteau
it: Sottotorte
ja: ケーキボード
nl: Cakeschaal
no: Kakefat
pl: Podkłady okrągłe pod torty
pt: Bandejas para bolo
ru: Подносы для тортов
sv: Kakfat
tr: Pasta Altlıkları

en: Cake Stands
xx: Cake Stands
cs: Podstavce na dorty
da: Kagestande
de: Tortenständer
es: Soportes para tarta
fr: Présentoirs à gâteaux
it: Ripiani per torte
ja: ケーキスタンド
nl: Taartstandaarden
no: Kakestativer
pl: Patery piętrowe
pt: Suportes para bolo
ru: Подставки для тортов
sv: Kakställ
tr: Pasta Tezgahları

en: Egg Cups
xx: Egg Cups
cs: Kalíšky na vajíčka
da: Æggebægre
de: Eierbecher
es: Copas para huevos
fr: Coquetiers
it: Portauova
ja: エッグカップ
nl: Eierdopjes
no: Eggeglass
pl: Kieliszki do jajek
pt: Copos para ovos quentes
ru: Подставки для яиц
sv: Äggkoppar
tr: Yumurtalıklar

en: Gravy Boats
xx: Gravy Boats
cs: Omáčkové misky
da: Sovsekander
de: Saucièren
es: Salseras
fr: Saucières
it: Salsiere
ja: ソースボート
nl: Juskommen
no: Sausenebb
pl: Sosjerki
pt: Molheiras
ru: Соусники
sv: Såssnipor
tr: Sos Servis Tabakları

en: Punch Bowls
xx: Punch Bowls
cs: Punčové mísy
da: Punchbowler
de: Bowleschüsseln
es: Poncheras
fr: Bols à punch
it: Zuppiere da punch
ja: パンチボウル
nl: Punchschalen
no: Punchboller
pl: Wazy na poncz
pt: Tigelas para ponche
ru: Чаши для пунша
sv: Bålskålar
tr: Punç Kaseleri

en: Serving Pitchers & Carafes
xx: Serving Pitchers & Carafes
cs: Servírovací džbány a karafy
da: Serveringskrukker og karafler
de: Karaffen
es: Jarras y decantadores
fr: Pichets et carafes
it: Brocche e caraffe da portata
ja: ピッチャー・カラフェ
nl: Pitchers en karaffen
no: Serveringsmugger og -karafler
pl: Dzbanki i karafki
pt: Jarras e garrafas para servir
ru: Сервировочные кувшины и графины
sv: Tillbringare och karaffer
tr: Servis Sürahi ve Testileri

en: Serving Platters
xx: Serving Platters
cs: Servírovací tácy
da: Serveringsfade
de: Servierplatten
es: Fuentes para servir
fr: Plats de service
it: Piatti da servizio
ja: オードブル皿
nl: Opdekschalen
no: Serveringsfat
pl: Półmiski
pt: Travessas para servir
ru: Сервировочные блюда
sv: Serveringsfat
tr: Servis Tabakları

en: Serving Trays
xx: Serving Trays
cs: Servírovací podnosy
da: Serveringsbakker
de: Serviertabletts
es: Bandejas
fr: Plateaux de service
it: Vassoi da portata
ja: お盆・トレイ
nl: Serveerschalen
no: Serveringsbrett
pl: Tacki
pt: Bandejas para servir
ru: Подносы
sv: Serveringsbrickor
tr: Servis Tepsileri

en: Sugar Bowls & Creamers
xx: Sugar Bowls & Creamers
cs: Cukřenky a šálky na smetanu
da: Sukkerskåle og flødekander
de: Zuckerdosen & Milchkännchen
es: Azucareros y lecheras
fr: Sucriers et crémiers
it: Recipienti zucchero e creme
ja: シュガーポット・クリーマー
nl: Suikerpotten en melkkannen
no: Sukkerskåler og fløtemugger
pl: Cukiernice i dzbanki na śmietankę
pt: Açucareiros e mantegueiras
ru: Сахарницы и сливочники
sv: Sockerskålar och gräddskålar
tr: Şeker Kaseleri ve Sütlükler

en: Tureens
xx: Tureens
cs: Polévkové mísy
da: Terriner
de: Terrinen
es: Soperas
fr: Soupières
it: Zuppiere
ja: チュリーン・フタ付き深皿
nl: Terrines
no: Terriner
pl: Wazy
pt: Terrinas
ru: Супницы
sv: Terriner
tr: Büyük Çorba Kaseleri

en: Serveware Accessories
xx: Serveware Accessories
cs: Jídelní servis – příslušenství
da: Serveringsfade og -skåle – tilbehør
de: Servierbesteck
es: Accesorios para utensilios de servir
fr: Accessoires de service
it: Accessori per piatti da portata
ja: 大皿・取り分け用食器小物
nl: Accessoires voor serveergoed
no: Tilbehør til serveringsartikler
pl: Akcesoria do naczyń do serwowania żywności
pt: Acessórios para servir
ru: Принадлежности для сервировки
sv: Tillbehör för matservering
tr: Servis Takımı Aksesuarları

en: Punch Bowl Stands
xx: Punch Bowl Stands
cs: Stojánek na mísu na punč
da: Punchbowlestander
de: Bowlenschüsseluntersatz
es: Soportes para poncheras
fr: Supports pour saladiers à punch
it: Supporti per scodelle da punch
ja: パンチボウルスタンド
nl: Staanders voor punchschalen
no: Punchbollestativer
pl: Stojaki do waz na poncz
pt: Suportes para tigelas de ponche
ru: Подставки для чаш с пуншем
sv: Bålskålsställ
tr: Punç Kasesi Tezgahları

en: Tureen Lids
xx: Tureen Lids
cs: Poklička na polévkovou mísu
da: Terrinlåg
de: Terrinendeckel
es: Tapas para soperas
fr: Couvercles de soupière
it: Coperchi per zuppiere
ja: チュリーン用フタ
nl: Terrinedeksels
no: Terrinlokk
pl: Pokrywki do waz
pt: Tampas para terrinas
ru: Крышки для супниц
sv: Terrinlock
tr: Büyük Çorba Kasesi Kapakları

en: Tureen Stands
xx: Tureen Stands
cs: Stojánek na polévkovou mísu
da: Terrinstander
de: Terrinenuntersatz
es: Soportes para soperas
fr: Supports de soupière
it: Supporti per zuppiere
ja: チュリーンスタンド
nl: Staanders voor terrines
no: Terrinstativer
pl: Stojaki na wazy
pt: Suportes para terrinas
ru: Подставки для супниц
sv: Terrinställ
tr: Büyük Çorba Kasesi Tezgahları

en: Tablecloth Clips & Weights
xx: Tablecloth Clips & Weights
cs: Závaží a svorky na ubrusy
da: Clips og vægte til duge
de: Klemmen & Gewichte für Tischdecken
es: Pesos y pinzas para manteles
fr: Pinces et poids de nappes
it: Clip e fermi per tovaglie
ja: テーブルクロス用クリップ・ウェイト
nl: Klemmen en gewichtjes voor tafelkleden
no: Dukklemmer og -vekter
pl: Klipsy i obciążniki do obrusów
pt: Clipes e pesos para toalha de mesa
ru: Прищепки и грузы для скатертей
sv: Dukclips och -vikter
tr: Masa Örtüsü Klipsleri ve Ağırlıkları